Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2707
Other transfer by fiduciary.

(1) Subject to subsection (3) of this section, a personal representative or trustee may make an irrevocable transfer to another adult or trust company as custodian for the benefit of a minor pursuant to section 43-2710, in the absence of a will or under a will or trust that does not contain an authorization to do so.

(2) Subject to subsection (3) of this section, a conservator may make an irrevocable transfer to another adult or trust company as custodian for the benefit of the minor pursuant to section 43-2710.

(3) A transfer under subsection (1) or (2) of this section may be made only if (a) the personal representative, trustee, or conservator considers the transfer to be in the best interest of the minor, (b) the transfer is not prohibited by or inconsistent with provisions of the applicable will, trust agreement, or other governing instrument, and (c) the transfer is authorized by the court if it exceeds forty thousand dollars in value.

Laws 1992, LB 907, § 7;

Laws 2024, LB1195, § 12.